Utah statutes.
61-1-15.5.   Federal covered securities.
(1)  The division by rule or order may require the filing of any of the
following documents with respect to a covered security under Section 18(b)(2)
of the Securities Act of 1933:
(a)  prior to the initial offer of federal covered security in this state, a
notice form as prescribed by the division or all documents that are part of a
federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, together with a consent to
service of process signed by the issuer and a filing fee as determined under
Section 61-1-18.4;
(b)  after the initial offer of such federal covered security in this state,
all documents that are part of an amendment to a federal registration
statement filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the
Securities Act of 1933, which shall be filed concurrently with the division;
(c)  a report of the value of federal covered securities offered or sold in
this state, together with a filing fee as determined under Section 61-1-18.4;
and
(d)  a notice filing under this section shall be effective for one year and
shall be renewed annually in order to continue to offer or sell the federal
covered securities for which the notice was filed.
(2)  With respect to a security that is a covered security under Section
18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933, the division by rule or order may
require the issuer to file a notice on SEC Form D and a consent to service of
process signed by the issuer no later than 15 days after the first sale of
such covered security in this state, together with a filing fee as determined
under Section 61-1-18.4.
(3)  The division by rule or order may require the filing of a document filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933,
with respect to a covered security under Securities Act of 1933, Section
18(b)(3) or (4), together with a filing fee as determined under Section
61-1-18.4.
(4)  Upon approval by a majority of the commission, the director, by means of
an adjudicative proceeding conducted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, may issue a stop order suspending the offer and
sale of a federal covered security, except a covered security under Section
18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, if the director finds that the order
is in the public interest and there is a failure to comply with any condition
established under this section.
(5)  The division by rule or order may waive any or all of the provisions of
this section.
